Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.500

Administrative hearings public—Exception.

Every hearing in an administrative proceeding shall be public unless the director in his or her discretion grants a request joined in by all the respondents that the hearing be conducted privately.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 36; 1959 c 282 s 50.]